src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-maeaeqdwltwb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mǟʼdõltõb: # Noun 160 'eng /est mälestis/fin' - full paradigm
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Nom: [mǟʼdõltõb, mǟdõltõb]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Gen: [mǟʼdõltõb, mǟdõltõb]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Par: [mǟʼdõltõbt, mǟdõltõbt]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Dat: [mǟʼdõltõbõn, mǟdõltõbõn]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ins: [mǟʼdõltõbõks, mǟdõltõbõks]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ill: [mǟʼdõltõbõ, mǟdõltõbõ]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ela: [mǟʼdõltõbst, mǟdõltõbst]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Nom: [mǟʼdõltõbõd, mǟdõltõbõd]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Gen: [mǟʼdõltõbõd, mǟdõltõbõd]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Par: [mǟʼdõltõbidi, mǟdõltõbidi]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Dat: [mǟʼdõltõbõdõn, mǟdõltõbõdõn]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ins: [mǟʼdõltõbõdõks, mǟdõltõbõdõks]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ill: [mǟʼdõltõbiž, mǟdõltõbiž]
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ela: [mǟʼdõltõbist, mǟdõltõbist]
